Illinois, session 104th, HB4638.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1195 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1195 new)7    Sec. 5-1195. Microtransit services. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "microtransit" means a 9transit service that transports a rider from a location chosen 10by the rider to a location chosen by the rider and does not use 11a fixed-route.12    (b) If a county offers microtransit services, then the 13county must provide riders with a method to prepay for the 14microtransit service with a smartphone application. 15    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by adding Section 1685-75 as follows: 17    (60 ILCS 1/85-75 new)18    Sec. 85-75. Microtransit services. 19    (a) As used in this Section, "microtransit" means a 20transit service that transports a rider from a location chosen 21by the rider to a location chosen by the rider and does not use   HB4638- 2 -LRB104 17778 RTM 31210 b1a fixed-route.2    (b) If a township offers microtransit services, then the 3county must provide riders with a method to prepay for the 4microtransit service with a smartphone application. 5    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 6adding the heading of Article 11 Div. 122.3 and Section 711-122.3-1 as follows: 8    (65 ILCS 5/Art. 11 Div. 122.3 heading new)9ARTICLE 11 Div. 122.3. MICROTRANSIT SERVICES 10    (65 ILCS 5/11-122.3-1 new)11    Sec. 11-122.3-1. Microtransit services. 12    (a) As used in this Section, "microtransit" means a 13transit service that transports a rider from a location chosen 14by the rider to a location chosen by the rider and does not use 15a fixed-route.16    (b) If a municipality offers microtransit services, then 17the county must provide riders with a method to prepay for the 18microtransit service with a smartphone application.